Texas, session 892, SB38.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Chapter 8, Local Government Code, is amended by adding Subchapter A-1 to read as follows: SUBCHAPTER A-1.  INCORPORATION AS TYPE C GENERAL-LAW MUNICIPALITY FOR CERTAIN MUNICIPALITIES IN OR NEAR SPECIAL FLOOD HAZARD AREA Sec. 8.011.  DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter: (1)  "Outdoor warning siren" means a system that produces a sound designed to alert a person who is outdoors of an imminent disaster and encourage that person to immediately seek shelter. (2)  "Special flood hazard area" means land in a floodplain subject to at least a one percent annual chance of flooding as designated by the director of the Federal Emergency Management Agency. Sec. 8.012.  AUTHORITY TO INCORPORATE AS TYPE C GENERAL-LAW MUNICIPALITY.  Notwithstanding Subchapter A, an unincorporated area located outside the extraterritorial jurisdiction of a municipality may incorporate under this subchapter as a Type C general-law municipality if: (1)  the area contains a special flood hazard area; or (2)  a special flood hazard area is located within 1,000 feet of the area. Sec. 8.013.  PETITION TO INCORPORATE; INCORPORATION.  (a) The residents or landowners of an area eligible to become a Type C general-law municipality under this subchapter may initiate an incorporation under this subchapter by filing with the county judge for the county in which the area is wholly or primarily located a written petition that: (1)  complies with the territorial requirements for a general-law municipality under Section 5.901; (2)  is signed by each resident of and owner of land in the area; and (3)  includes the text of a proposed flood preparedness ordinance that complies with Section 8.014. (b)  On receipt of a petition that complies with Subsection (a), the county judge shall accept the petition, issue an order of incorporation with immediate effect for the area as a Type C general-law municipality, and enter the order in the minutes of the commissioners court reflecting that the area is incorporated. Sec. 8.014.  FLOOD PREPAREDNESS ORDINANCE. Not later than the 90th day after the date of incorporation, the governing body of a municipality incorporated under this subchapter shall adopt a flood preparedness ordinance that must: (1)  establish requirements regarding flood hazard mitigation, preparedness, and response that meet applicable state and federal requirements; (2)  require compliance with the minimum requirements of the National Flood Insurance Program; (3)  establish an office of municipal flood hazard mitigation administrator to ensure compliance with the requirements of an ordinance under this section; (4)  require that the issuance of any building permit for a new structure or expansion to an existing structure designed for human occupancy is subject to compliance with an ordinance under this section; (5)  prohibit, without exception, the building of a new structure or expansion of an existing structure designed for human occupancy within a special flood hazard area, unless otherwise required by state or federal law; (6)  prohibit the building of a new structure or expansion of an existing structure within 1,000 feet of a special flood hazard area if: (A)  more than 10 years have passed since the effective date of the flood insurance rate map published by the Federal Emergency Management Agency for the area proposed for development; or (B)  the flood insurance rate map has not been updated within one year of publication of the most recent version of the NOAA Precipitation Frequency Atlas of the United States, as that phrase is defined by 15 U.S.C. Section 9707; and (7)  provide an exception to the prohibition under Subdivision (6) if: (A)  the person requesting to build a new structure or expand an existing structure within 1,000 feet of a special flood hazard area: (i)  agrees to pay the cost of a Letter of Map Revision from the Federal Emergency Management Agency and receives the Letter of Map Revision; or (ii)  has the area redesignated from Zone A to Zone AE, as defined by the Federal Emergency Management Agency, to ensure detailed elevation studies and an accurate flood map, as required by the municipality; or (B)  a current elevation certificate shows that the adjacent grade of the area for the proposed development is exclusively on land that is elevated at least 20 feet above the special flood hazard area and there is a means of safe egress from the proposed development area to an area outside of and elevated at least 20 feet above the special flood hazard area. Sec. 8.015.  ADOPTION OF ORDINANCE REQUIRED; AUTOMATIC DISSOLUTION. A municipality incorporated under this subchapter is dissolved by operation of law on a finding by the county judge of the county with whom the petition was filed under Section 8.013 that the municipality did not adopt the flood preparedness ordinance filed under Section 8.013 as a municipal ordinance on or before the 90th day after the date of incorporation. Sec. 8.016.  INCENTIVE PROGRAM. A municipality that incorporates under this subchapter shall adopt an ordinance establishing an incentive program to encourage the relocation or demolition of structures designed for human occupancy from a special flood hazard area. Sec. 8.017.  FLOOD HAZARD MITIGATION, PREPAREDNESS, AND RESPONSE PLAN.  A municipality that incorporates under this subchapter shall, on or before the 90th day after the date of incorporation, adopt a plan for flood hazard mitigation, preparedness, and response.  The plan must: (1)  provide for the coordination of the municipality's elected officials, emergency officials, and city manager with the applicable county, state, and federal emergency management officials regarding future, current, or past flood events; (2)  include a communication plan for future, current, or past flood events; (3)  include search and rescue protocols; and (4)  include a proposal of mutual aid agreements for potential flood events that may occur within a five-mile radius of the municipality inside the county or counties in which the municipality is located. Sec. 8.018.  REQUIRED OUTDOOR WARNING SIREN. (a)  In addition to any other requirements regarding disaster alert systems under state or federal law, a municipality that incorporates under this subchapter shall require the installation of an outdoor warning siren to provide advance warning of an anticipated flood event that will alert the residents of any structure that is located within 1,000 feet of a special flood hazard area. (b)  If another governmental entity maintains an outdoor warning siren that fulfills the requirements of this section, the municipality is not required to install an additional outdoor warning siren. Sec. 8.019.  BARRIERS FOR FLOOD-PRONE ROADWAYS.  A municipality that incorporates under this subchapter shall install automated crossing arms and visual and auditory alarms to impede non-emergency pedestrian and vehicle traffic over any portion of a roadway under the control of the municipality that is within the special flood hazard area. Sec. 8.020.  CONFLICTS WITH STATE LAW. To the extent another state law conflicts with this subchapter, the more strict requirement regarding emergency management controls. SECTION 2.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.